Vermont statutes. Title 26 Professions and Occupations
Subchapter 1. General Provisions

§ 1311.
Definitions.

As used in this chapter:

“Practice of medicine” means:

using the designation “Doctor,” “Doctor of Medicine,” “Physician,” “Dr.,” “M.D.,” or any combination thereof in the conduct of any occupation or profession pertaining to the prevention, diagnosis, or treatment of human disease or condition unless the designation additionally contains the description of another branch of the healing arts for which one holds a valid license in Vermont;

advertising, holding out to the public, or representing in any manner that one is authorized to practice medicine in the jurisdiction;

offering or undertaking to prescribe, order, give, or administer any drug or medicine for the use of any other person;

offering or undertaking to prevent, diagnose, correct, or treat in any manner or by any means, methods, or devices any disease, illness, pain, wound, fracture, infirmity, defect, or abnormal physical or mental condition of any person, including the management of all aspects of pregnancy, labor and delivery, and postpartum care;

offering or undertaking to perform any surgical operation upon any person;

rendering a written or otherwise documented medical opinion concerning the diagnosis or treatment of a patient or the actual rendering of treatment to a patient within the State by a physician located outside the State as a result of the transmission of individual patient data by electronic or other means from within the State to the physician or his or her agent; or

rendering a determination of medical necessity or a decision affecting the diagnosis or treatment of a patient.

“Board” means the Board of Medical Practice established under section 1351 of this title.

“License” means license to practice medicine and surgery in the State as defined in subchapter 3 of this chapter. “Licensee” includes any individual licensed or certified by the Board.

“Medical director” means, for purposes of this chapter, a physician who is Board-certified or Board-eligible in his or her field of specialty, as determined by the American Board of Medical Specialties (ABMS), and who is charged by a health maintenance organization with responsibility for overseeing all clinical activities of the plan in this State, or his or her designee.

“Health maintenance organization,” as used in this section, has the same meaning as in

18 V.S.A. § 9402(9)

.

“Members” means members of the Board.

“Secretary” means the secretary of the Board.

HISTORY:

Amended

1975, No. 249

(Adj. Sess.), § 1;

1999, No. 133

(Adj. Sess.), § 49;

2001, No. 129

(Adj. Sess.), § 20, eff. June 13, 2002;

2003, No. 34

, § 4, eff. May 23, 2003;

2009, No. 25

, § 10;

2011, No. 61

, § 2, eff. June 2, 2011;

2015, No. 97

(Adj. Sess.), § 60;

2019, No. 126

(Adj. Sess.), § 1.

§ 1312.
Faith cure; mind healing; laying on of hands.

The provisions of this chapter shall apply to persons professing and attempting to cure disease by means of “faith cure,” “mind healing,” or “laying on of hands,” but shall not apply to persons who merely practice the religious tenets of their church without pretending a knowledge of medicine or surgery.

§ 1313.
Exemptions.

The provisions of this chapter shall not apply to the following:

A health care professional licensed or certified by the Office of Professional Regulation when that person is practicing within the scope of his or her profession.

A member of the U.S. Armed Forces or National Guard carrying out official military duties, including a National Guard member in state active duty status, or to any person giving aid, assistance, or relief in emergency or accident cases, pending the arrival of a regularly licensed physician.

A nonresident physician coming into this State to consult or using telecommunications to consult with a duly licensed practitioner herein.

A duly licensed physician in another state, in Canada, or in another nation as approved by the Board, who is visiting a medical school or a teaching hospital in this State to receive or conduct medical instruction for a period not to exceed three months, provided the practice is limited to that instruction and is under the supervision of a physician licensed by the Board.

A physician who is duly licensed and in good standing in another state, territory, or jurisdiction of the United States or in Canada if the physician is employed as or formally designated as the team physician by an athletic team visiting Vermont for a specific sporting event and the physician limits the practice of medicine in this State to medical treatment of the members, coaches, and staff of the sports team employing or designating the physician.

A student who is enrolled in an accredited educational program that leads to the issuance of a degree that would satisfy the educational requirement for a profession licensed or certified by the Board, who is engaged in an organized clinical training program, and who engages in acts constituting the practice of medicine while under the supervision of a Vermont-licensed or Vermont-certified health care professional who is qualified to supervise any acts by the student that constitute the practice of medicine. This exemption does not apply to postgraduate trainees who are required to obtain a training license.

The provisions of sections 1311 and 1312 of this title shall not apply to a person, firm, or corporation that manufactures or sells patent, compound, or proprietary medicines that are compounded according to the prescription of a physician who has been duly authorized to practice medicine, or to the domestic administration of family remedies.

HISTORY:

Amended

1971, No. 221

(Adj. Sess.), § 2;

1995, No. 171

(Adj. Sess.), § 2;

2003, No. 34

, § 14, eff. May 23, 2003;

2011, No. 61

, § 2, eff. June 2, 2011;

2015, No. 94

(Adj. Sess.), § 2, eff. May 10, 2016;

2019, No. 126

(Adj. Sess.), § 1.

§ 1314.
Illegal practice.

A person who, not being licensed, advertises or holds himself or herself out to the public as described in section 1311 of this title, or who, not being licensed, practices medicine as defined in section 1311 of this title, or who practices medicine under a fictitious or assumed name, or who impersonates another practitioner or who is not a licensed health care professional as defined in

18 V.S.A. § 5202

and signs a certificate of death for the purpose of burial or removal, shall be imprisoned not more than two years or fined not more than $10,000.00, or both.

An action shall not be maintained by such person for the recovery of compensation for such services.

HISTORY:

Amended

2011, No. 61

, § 2, eff. June 2, 2011.

§ 1317.
Unprofessional conduct to be reported to Board.

Required reporters. Any hospital, clinic, community mental health center, or other health care institution in which a licensee performs professional services shall report to the Board, along with supporting information and evidence, any reportable disciplinary action taken by it or its staff.

Definition of reportable disciplinary action. A reportable disciplinary action is an action based on one or more of the following:

Acts or omissions of a licensee that relate to the licensee’s fitness or competence to practice medicine under the license held.

Acts or omissions of the licensee that constitute a violation of a law or rule that relates in any way to the practice of medicine.

Acts or omissions of the licensee that occur in the course of practice and result in one or more of the following:

Resignation, leave of absence, termination, or nonrenewal of an employment relationship or contract. This includes a licensee’s own initiation of such action following notification to the licensee by the reporter that the reporter or an affiliated entity is conducting an investigation or inquiry regarding an event that, assuming the accuracy of the information or allegation, is likely to result in reportable disciplinary action. The reporter or affiliated entity shall complete the investigation or inquiry even if the licensee initiates a resignation, leave of absence, termination, or nonrenewal, and shall make a report to the Board if the investigation results in a finding of a reportable disciplinary action. Resignations and leaves of absence that are entirely voluntary by the licensee, and terminations and nonrenewals of employment or contract by a required reporter that are not related to acts or omissions of the licensee, are not reportable disciplinary actions.

Revocation, suspension, restriction, relinquishment, or nonrenewal of a right or privilege. This includes a licensee’s own initiation of such action following notification to the licensee by the reporter that the reporter or an affiliated entity is conducting an investigation or inquiry regarding an event that, assuming the accuracy of the information or allegation, is likely to result in reportable disciplinary action. The reporter or affiliated entity shall complete the investigation or inquiry even if the licensee initiates a resignation, leave of absence, termination, or nonrenewal, and shall make a report to the Board if the investigation results in a finding of a reportable disciplinary action. Relinquishments of privileges that are entirely voluntary by the licensee, and revocations, nonrenewals, or other limitations on privileges by a required reporter that are not related to acts or omissions of the licensee, are not reportable disciplinary actions.

Written discipline that constitutes a censure, reprimand, or admonition, if it is the second or subsequent censure, reprimand, or admonition within a 12-month period for the same or related acts or omissions that previously resulted in written censure, reprimand, or admonition. The same or related acts or omissions includes similar behavior or behavior involving the same parties, or both. Oral censure, oral reprimand, and oral admonition are not considered reportable disciplinary actions, and notation of an oral censure, oral reprimand, or oral admonition in a personnel or supervisor’s file does not transform the action from oral to written.

Fine or any other form of monetary penalty imposed as a form of discipline.

Required education, remedial counseling, or monitoring that is imposed as a result of a completed, contested disciplinary process. This includes recommendation or referral for services from the Vermont Practitioner Recovery Network established pursuant to section 1401a of this chapter, or from an employer wellness program or similar program, as a result of a completed, contested disciplinary process.

Timing of reports. A required report of reportable disciplinary action under subsection (b) of this section shall be made within 30 days following the date on which the disciplinary action was taken or upon completion of an investigation or inquiry pursuant to subdivision (b)(3)(A) or (B) of this section.

Mental health services. If reportable disciplinary action is reported to the Board based on a licensee’s provision of mental health services, the Commissioner of Health shall forward the report to the Commissioners of Mental Health and of Disabilities, Aging, and Independent Living. Except as provided in section 1368 of this title, information provided to the Department of Health, the Department of Mental Health, or the Department of Disabilities, Aging, and Independent Living under this section shall be confidential unless the Department of Health decides to treat the report as a complaint; in which case, the provisions of section 1318 of this title shall apply.

Limitation on liability. A person who acts in good faith in accordance with the provisions of this section shall not be liable for damages in any civil action based on the fact that a report was made.

Violations. A reporter who violates this section shall be subject to a civil penalty of not more than $5,000.00, provided that a reporter who employs or grants privileges to five or more Board licensees and who violates this section shall be subject to a civil penalty of not more than $10,000.00.

HISTORY:

Added

2001, No. 132

(Adj. Sess.), § 3, eff. June 13, 2002; amended

2007, No. 15

, § 20;

2007, No. 172

(Adj. Sess.), § 7a;

2011, No. 61

, § 2, eff. June 2, 2011;

2015, No. 23

, § 13;

2019, No. 126

(Adj. Sess.), § 1.

§ 1318.
Accessibility and confidentiality of disciplinary matters.

It is the purpose of this section both to protect the reputation of licensees from public disclosure of unwarranted complaints against them and to fulfill the public’s right to know of any action taken against a licensee when that action is based on a determination of unprofessional conduct.

All meetings and hearings of the Board shall be open to the public, except in accord with

1 V.S.A. § 313

.

The Commissioner of Health shall prepare and maintain a register of all complaints, which shall be a public record, and which shall show:
(c) (1) The Commissioner of Health shall prepare and maintain a register of all complaints, which shall be a public record, and which shall show:

with respect to all complaints, the following information:

the date and the nature of the complaint, but not including the identity of the licensee; and

a summary of the completed investigation; and

only with respect to complaints resulting in filing of disciplinary charges or stipulations or the taking of disciplinary action and except as provided in subdivision (2) of this subsection (c), the following additional information, except for medical and other protected health information contained therein pertaining to any identifiable person that is otherwise confidential by State or federal law:

the name and business addresses of the licensee and complainant;

formal charges, provided they have been served or a reasonable effort to serve them has been made;

the findings, conclusions, and order of the Board;

the transcript of the hearing, if one has been made, and exhibits admitted at the hearing;

stipulations presented to the Board at a public meeting;

final disposition of the matter by the courts; and

a summary of the final disposition of the matter indicating any charges that were dismissed and any charges resulting in a finding of unprofessional conduct.

The Commissioner shall remove from the register any of the information described in subdivision (1)(B) of this subsection if the final disposition of the matter dismisses all charges filed against a licensee in the same action. The Commissioner shall ensure that the period for appealing an order has expired prior to removing any such information from the register, and shall remove that information within five business days of the expiration of the appeal period.

The Commissioner shall not make public any information regarding disciplinary complaints, proceedings, or records, except the information required to be released under this section. The Commissioner shall, upon request, provide information that was maintained on the register under subdivision (c)(1) of this section but that was later removed from the register under the provisions of subdivision (c)(2) of this section.

A licensee or applicant shall have the right to inspect and copy all information in the possession of the Department of Health pertaining to the licensee or applicant, except investigatory files that have not resulted in charges of unprofessional conduct and attorney work product.

As used in this section, “disciplinary action” means action that suspends, revokes, limits, or conditions licensure or certification in any way, and includes reprimands and administrative penalties.

Nothing in this section shall prohibit the disclosure of information by the Commissioner regarding disciplinary complaints to Vermont or other state or federal law enforcement or regulatory agencies in the execution of its duties authorized by statute or regulation, including the Department of Disabilities, Aging, and Independent Living or the Department of Financial Regulation in the course of its investigations about an identified licensee, provided the agency or department agrees to maintain the confidentiality and privileged status of the information as provided in subsection (d) of this section.

Nothing in this section shall prohibit the Board, at its discretion, from sharing investigative and adjudicatory files of an identified licensee with another state, territorial, or international medical board at any time during the investigational or adjudicative process.

Neither the Commissioner nor any person who received documents, material, or information while acting under the authority of the Commissioner shall be permitted or required to testify in any private civil action concerning any confidential documents, material, or information.

HISTORY:

Added

2001, No. 132

(Adj. Sess.), § 4, eff. June 13, 2002; amended

2003, No. 34

, § 5, eff. May 23, 2003;

2011, No. 61

, § 2, eff. June 2, 2011;

2011, No. 78

(Adj. Sess.), § 2, eff. April 2, 2012;

2013, No. 130

(Adj. Sess.), § 1.